zh-CN: 尾鳍盒系统: 2+1 尾鳍盒; 双卡槽; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; 固定尾鳍; Futures; 单卡槽; US Box; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem naseda za plavut: Ohišje za smernike 2+1; Dvojni jeziček; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Fiksni smerniki; Futures; Enojni jeziček; US Box; Drugo
sk-SK: Systém uchytenia plutvy: Box na 2+1 plutvy; Dve zarážky (Dual tab); FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Pevné plutvy; Futures; Jedna zarážka (Single tab); US Box; Iné
nl: Fin box-systeem: 2+1 vinbox; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Vaste vinnen; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Overig
pl: System skrzynki statecznika: Skrzynka 2+1 (stateczniki); Podwójny wtyk (Dual tab); FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Stateczniki wklejone na stałe; Futures; Pojedynczy wtyk (Single tab); US Box; Inny
hu: Uszonydoboz-rendszer: 2+1 szkegdoboz; Dupla füles; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Rögzített szkegek; Futures; Szimpla füles; US Box; Egyéb
it: Sistema di scatole per pinne: Scassa per pinna 2+1; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Pinne fisse; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Altro
ja: フィンボックスシステム: 2+1フィンボックス; デュアルタブ; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; 固定フィン; Futures; シングルタブ; USボックス; その他
ru: Система финбокса: Система 2+1; Два выступа (Dual tab); FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Несъемные плавники; Futures; Один выступ (Single tab); US Box; Другое
es: Sistema de caja de aletas: Caja de quillas 2+1; Lengüeta doble; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Quillas fijas; Futures; Lengüeta simple; US Box; Otro
pt-PT: Sistema de caixa de alhetas: Caixa de quilha 2+1; Aba dupla; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Quilhas fixas; Futures; Aba única; US Box; Outro
fr: Système de boîtier d’aileron: Boîtier d'aileron 2+1; À double languette; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Ailerons fixes; Futures; À languette unique; US Box; Autre
hr-HR: Sustav perajastih kutija: 2+1 kutija za peraju; Dvostruki jezičak; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Fiksne peraje; Futures; Jednostruki jezičak; US Box; Ostalo
en: Fin box system: 2+1 fin box; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Fixed fins; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Other
fi: Eväkiinnikejärjestelmä: 2+1 evälaatikko; Kaksikielekkeinen; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Kiinteät evät; Futures; Yksikielekkeinen; US Box; Muu
lt-LT: Peleko dėžutės sistema: 2+1 pelekų dėžutė; Dvigubas tvirtinimas; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Fiksuoti pelekai; „Futures“; Vienas tvirtinimas; „US Box“; Kita
nb: Finnebokssystem: 2+1-finneboks; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Faste finner; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Annet
th: ระบบกล่องฟิน: กล่องฟิน 2+1; แท็บคู่; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; ฟินแบบติดถาวร; Futures; แท็บเดี่ยว; US Box; อื่นๆ
el: Σύστημα κιβωτίου πτερυγίων: Κουτί για πτερύγια 2+1; Διπλή προεξοχή; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Σταθερά πτερύγια; Futures; Μονή προεξοχή; US Box; Άλλο
cs: Systém ploutví: Systém 2+1; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Pevné ploutve; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Jiné
zh-TW: 鰭盒系統: 2+1 舵盒; 雙卡榫; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; 固定尾舵; Futures; 單卡榫; US Box; 其他
sv: Finbox-system: 2+1 fenbox; Dubbel flik; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Fasta fenor; Futures; Enkel flik; US Box; Övrigt
bg-BG: Система на кутията за финка: 2+1 система за финки; Двоен таб; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Фиксирани финки; Futures; Единичен таб; US Box; Други
da: Finnekasseystem: 2+1 finneboks; Dual tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Faste finner; Futures; Single tab; US Box; Andet
ko: 핀 박스 시스템: 2+1 핀 박스; 듀얼 탭; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; 고정 핀; Futures; 싱글 탭; US Box; 기타
pt-BR: Sistema de caixa de quilhas: Caixa de quilha 2+1; Guia dupla; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Quilhas fixas; Futures; Guia simples; US Box; Outro
ro-RO: Sistem cu cutii cu aripioare: Cutie aripioară 2+1; Bază dublă (Dual tab); FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Aripioare fixe; Futures; Bază unică (Single tab); US Box; Altele
tr: Fin kutusu sistemi: 2+1 yüzgeç kutusu; Çift tırnaklı; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Sabit yüzgeçler; Futures; Tek tırnaklı; US Box; Diğer
de: Finnenkastensystem: 2+1-Finnenkasten; Dual-Tab; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Feste Finnen; Futures; Single-Tab; US Box; Sonstige
vi: Hệ thống hộp vây: Hộp vây 2+1; Tab kép; FCS; FCS I; FCS II; Vây cố định; Futures; Tab đơn; US Box; Khác